North Carolina, session 2025, SB547.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-537(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Ballot Question. – The form of the question to be presented on a ballot for a special
election concerning the levy of the tax authorized by this Article shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Local sales and use tax at the rate of one-quarter percent (0.25%) (one-quarter of one penny) in
addition to all other State and local sales and use taxes."taxes, the proceeds of which can be used
for any public purpose.""
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to advisory
referendums under Article 46 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes conducted on or after that
date.
*S547-v-1*